West Virginia, session 2025, SB884.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. ACTIONS FOR INJURIES. §55-7-33. Liability for injury or damage resulting from intoxication. (a) A person, who willfully and unlawfully furnishes alcoholic beverages to a person who is not of lawful drinking age or who knowingly serves a person habitually addicted to the use of any or all alcoholic beverages, may be liable in a civil action for injury or damage caused by or resulting from the intoxicated person served.(b) In addition to potential civil liability, a person who willfully and unlawfully furnishes alcoholic beverages to a person who is a minor in violation of subsection (a) of this section may be criminally prosecuted for contributing to the delinquency of a child pursuant to §61-8D-10 of this code.(c) This section does not apply to a retail licensee, or an agent or employee thereof acting in the scope of his or her employment.(d)  This section does not abrogate, modify, or otherwise affect any obligation, penalty, or remedy imposed by §60-3A-1 et seq. of this code.